Massachusetts, session 194th, H1375.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be a
commission to study and provide recommendations to address and prevent surprise outside
billing.
SECTION 2. The commission shall consist of the house and senate chairs of the joint
committee on health care financing, who shall serve as the co-chairs; one member to be
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; one member to be appointed by the
president of the senate; one member to be appointed by the house minority leader; one member
to be appointed by the senate minority leader; the director of the health policy commission or a
of 2

designee; the commissioner of the department of public health or a designee; and the executive
director of the center for health information and analysis or a designee.
SECTION 3. The commission shall consider and evaluate the efficacy of policies that
require hospitals and other health care providers to sell bundled packages of services that include
fees for all relevant physicians, including but not limited to anesthesiologists, pathologists, and
radiologists, with the intention of limiting and preventing surprise outside billing. The
commission shall take into consideration similar laws put in place by other states. The
commission shall develop recommendations including but not limited to prohibiting surprise
outside billing, requiring insurance carriers to hold members harmless, and applying regulations
across all providers, including health maintenance organizations and preferred provider
organizations.
SECTION 4. The commission shall submit its report and findings, along with any
recommendations and drafted legislation, to the house and senate committees on ways and
means, the joint committee on health care financing, and the clerks of the house of
representatives and senate within 12 months of the passage of this act.
of 2